New York, session 2025-2026, S110.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The legislative law is amended by adding a new section 13 2 to read as follows: 3 § 13. Limitations on line item appropriations prior to an election. No 4 member of the legislature shall disburse or make public any single grant 5 pursuant to memoranda of understanding or any segregation of lump sum 6 appropriation for unspecified capital projects and operating grants 7 resulting from the state budget process between the executive and the 8 legislature within sixty days prior to such member's election. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 10 law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00688-01-5